Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1826
Department of Correctional Services; confined persons; provide for employment.

The Department of Correctional Services shall, as far as possible, provide for the employment, eight hours per day, of confined persons by private businesses. The employment may be provided under section 81-1827, 83-183, or 83-184.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 26;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 29.